chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е
 %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
 %{н%}:н %{н%}:0
 %{Р%}:р %{Р%}:т


;

Sets 

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ ; 

Vow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ӗ э и ӳ ;

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 

ArchiCns = %{м%} %{н%};

Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ; 


"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ă}"
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
                                     %{м%}: %>:  _ н;


"constraining %{A%} to be 0 when following %{м%}"
%{Ă%}:0 <=>  %{м%}:  %>: _ н ;


"м to be 0 when genitive pl"
%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: ( :0 ) [ н | %{н%}:н ] ;
						

!"constraining Ă to be 0 when gen"
!%{Ă%}:0 <=> Vow %>: _ ;
